Alabama, session 2026rs, HB44.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) For the purposes of this section, the
following terms have the following meanings:
(1) DEPARTMENT. The Alabama Department of Human
Resources.
(2) SNAP BENEFIT. A financial benefit, coupon, or
privilege available under the federal Supplemental Nutrition
Assistance Program, 7 U.S.C. Chapter 51.
(3) USDA FOOD AND NUTRITION SERVICE. The United States
Department of Agriculture Food and Nutrition Service.
(b) The commissioner of the department shall request a
waiver from the USDA Food and Nutrition Service to authorize
the department to add hot rotisserie chickens to the
definition of "eligible foods" under 7 C.F.R. § 271.2.
(c) If the waiver described in subsection (b) is
approved by the USDA Food and Nutrition Service, the
department shall authorize the use of SNAP benefits for the
purchase of hot rotisserie chickens.
(d) If the waiver described in subsection (b) is
denied, the commissioner shall resubmit the request for a
waiver to the USDA Food and Nutrition Service annually, until
approval is granted.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2